Massachusetts, session 194th, H2066.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 159A½ of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (d) the following subsection:-
(e) A driver who violates section 2(g) shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500
for a first offense, by a fine of not more than $750 for a second offense, and by a fine of not more
than $1000 for a third offense.
SECTION 2. Section 2(g) of chapter 159A½ of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “needs” in line 1, the following:-
, and shall impose fines in accordance with Section 7(e).
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1